New York, session 2025-2026, S8911.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 190 of the tax law, as amended by 2 section 102 of part A of chapter 59 of the laws of 2014, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 1. General. A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 5 imposed by this article equal to [twenty] forty percent of the premium 6 paid during the taxable year for long-term care insurance. In order to 7 qualify for such credit, the taxpayer's premium payment must be for the 8 purchase of or for continuing coverage under a long-term care insurance 9 policy that qualifies for such credit pursuant to section one thousand 10 one hundred seventeen of the insurance law. 11 § 2. Paragraph 1 of subsection (aa) of section 606 of the tax law, as 12 amended by section 1 of part E of chapter 59 of the laws of 2020, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 (1) Residents. There shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 15 by this article in an amount equal to [twenty] forty percent of the 16 premiums paid during the taxable year for long-term care insurance. The 17 credit amount shall not exceed [one] two thousand five hundred dollars 18 and shall be allowed only if the amount of New York adjusted gross 19 income required to be reported on the return is less than two hundred 20 fifty thousand dollars. In order to qualify for such credit, the taxpay- 21 er's premium payment must be for the purchase of or for continuing 22 coverage under a long-term care insurance policy that qualifies for such 23 credit pursuant to section one thousand one hundred seventeen of the 24 insurance law. If the amount of the credit allowable under this 25 subsection for any taxable year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such 26 year, the excess may be carried over to the following year or years and 27 may be deducted from the taxpayer's tax for such year or years. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14198-01-5 S. 8911 2 1 § 3. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 14 of section 210-B of the tax law, 2 as added by section 17 of part A of chapter 59 of the laws of 2014, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) General. A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 5 imposed by this article equal to [twenty] forty percent of the premium 6 paid during the taxable year for long-term care insurance. In order to 7 qualify for such credit, the taxpayer's premium payment must be for the 8 purchase of or for continuing coverage under a long-term care insurance 9 policy that qualifies for such credit pursuant to section one thousand 10 one hundred seventeen of the insurance law. 11 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.